trunk/morphology/analyzer_xfst/quechua-web.xfst
	define CHA1 [  {ch}"@CHA"  => Vowel _  ];
	define CHA2 [  {chi}"@CHA"  => Cons _  ];
	define CHA3 [  {cha}"@CHA" => Cons _  ];

       #define AmbiRules EVID1 .o. EVID2 .o. EVID3 .o. EVID4;
	define AmbiRules SI1 .o. SI2 .o. MI1 .o. MI2 .o. MI3 .o. CHA1 .o. CHA2 .o. CHA3;

########################################################################
########################################################################
##                                                                    ##
##               DERIVATION BOUNDARIES                                ##
##                                                                    ##
########################################################################
########################################################################


      #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#
      # 1. special case: last verbal IG: DB before aspect, tense, if present, else before person suffix  #
      # 2. special case: last IG as-suffixes, DB before slot 6 if present, else slot 7                   #
      #--------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------#

      define IGverb1  [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || "+Prog"%] _  ?* [%["Tns"%]|%["VPers"%]] ];
      define IGverb2  [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["+NPst"|"+IPst"|"+Prog"]%] _  ?* %["VPers" ];
      define IGas1     [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["+Top"|"+QTop"|"+Dub"]%] _  ];
      define IGas2     [ "" <-  %["^DB"%] || ["@MI"|"@SI"|"@CHA"] _  ];
define IGRules IGverb1 .o. IGverb2 .o. IGas1 .o. IGas2;


#################################################################################

      #######################
      #                     #
      # AMBIVALENT SUFFIXES #
      #                     #
      #######################

      define AS=1 DB @re"as-1.regex" ;
      define AS=2 DB @re"as-2.regex" ;
      define AS=3 DB @re"as-3.regex" ;
      define AS=4 DB @re"as-4.regex" ;
      define AS=5 DB @re"as-5.regex" ;
      define AS=6 DB @re"as-6.regex" ;
      define AS=7 DB @re"as-7.regex" ;
      define HonAff DB @re"hon_aff.regex";
      define NtinWan DB @re"ntin-wan.regex";

      define AS [(HonAff) (AS=1) (HonAff) (AS=2) (AS=3)^{0,2} (HonAff) (AS=4) (HonAff) (AS=5) (AS=6) (AS=7)] ;


####################################################################################

       ##########
       #        #
       # VERBS  #
       #        #
       ##########

       define VRootQ @re"vroot-with-translations.regex" .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       define VRootES @re"vroot-es.regex" .o. SpanOrtho;
       define VRootTrans @re"vroot-trans-with-translations.regex" .o. QuechuaOrtho;  

       define VROOT [VRootQ|VRootES];

       define V=V=1 @re"v-v-1.regex" ;
       define V=V=2 @re"v-v-2.regex" ;
       define V=V=3 DB @re"v-v-3.regex" ;
       define V=V=4 DB @re"v-v-4.regex" ;
       define V=V=5 DB @re"v-v-5.regex" ;
       define V=V=6 DB @re"v-v-6.regex" ;
       define V=V=7 @re"v-v-7.regex" ;

    define VerbSuffixes  VerbRulesUpper  .o. [V=V=1^{0,4} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,3} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4)(HonAff) (V=V=5) (HonAff) V=V=6 (V=V=7)]  .o. VerbRulesLower .o. QuechuaOrtho;


#####################################################################################

       #########
       #       #
       # NOUNS #
       #       #
       #########

       define NRootQ @re"nroot-with-translations.regex"  .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       define NRootES @re"nroot-es.regex" .o. SpanOrtho ;
       define NRootNUM  @re"nroot-num.regex"   .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       define NRootINDEF @re"nroot-indef-with-translations.regex" .o. QuechuaOrtho;
       define NRootCMP @re"nroot-cmp-with-translations.regex" .o. QuechuaOrtho;

       define NROOT [NRootQ|NRootES|NRootNUM|NRootINDEF];

       define N=N=1 @re"n-n-1.regex" ;
       define N=N=2 DB @re"n-n-2.regex" ;
       define N=N=3 DB @re"n-n-3.regex" ;
       define N=N=4 @re"n-n-4.regex" ;
       define N=N=5 DB @re"n-n-5.regex" ;
       define N=N=6 DB @re"n-n-6.regex" ;
       define N=N=7 DB @re"n-n-7.regex" ;
       define kamaDist [ "[" "^DB" "]" "[" "--" "]" {kama}  "[" "Cas" "]" "[" "+Dist" "]"] : {kama};

      define NounSuffixes PossessivPlural .o. [(N=N=1) (HonAff) N=N=2^{0,2} (HonAff) (kamaDist) (N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (N=N=5)^{0,3} (HonAff) N=N=6^{0,3} N=N=7^{0,2} (HonAff)]  .o. QuechuaOrtho ;

######################################################################################

      ######################
      #                    #
      # DERIVED ROOTS      #
      #                    #
      ######################


       define NtoV @re"n-v.regex" ;
       define VtoN DB @re"v-n.regex" ; #mit diesen Suffixen nominalisierte Verben können nicht wieder verbalisiert werden
       define VtoNfinal DB @re"v-n-final.regex" ;
       define Relational [{n} "[" "NDeriv" "]""[" "+Rel" "]" ] : {n};
       define VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS  VerbRulesUpper .o. [V=V=1^{0,3} (HonAff) V=V=2^{0,3} (HonAff) (V=V=1) (HonAff) (V=V=3) (HonAff) (V=V=4) (HonAff)] .o. VerbRulesLower;

       #------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs:     #
       # VRoot + VtoN = NDeriv1 #
       # "taki-qti", "taki-y"   #
       #------------------------#
       define NDeriv1 [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv1final [VROOT  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];

       #----------------------------#
       # verbalized nouns:          #
       # NRoot + NtoV = VDeriv1     #
       # "wasi-n-cha-", "hatun-ya-" #
       # NtoV: -ykacha/kacha as     #
       # verbalizing suffix         #
       #----------------------------#
       define VDeriv1 [NROOT (Relational) (HonAff) NtoV];

       #--------------------------------#
       # nominalized verb Nr.2:         #
       # NRoot + NtoV + VtoN = NDeriv2  #
       # "wasi-n-cha-y", "hatun-ya-sqa" #
       #--------------------------------#
       define NDeriv2 [VDeriv1  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv2final [VDeriv1  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];

       #--------------------------------#
       # verbalized noun Nr.2:          #
       # VRoot + VtoN + NtoV = VDeriv1  #
       # "yaku-naya-q"                  #
       #--------------------------------#
       define VDeriv2 [NDeriv1 NtoV];

       #-------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verbs Nr.3:             #
       # VRoot + VtoN + NtoV +VtoN = NDeriv3 #
       # "yuya-y-cha-ku-y"                   #
       #-------------------------------------#
       define NDeriv3 [VDeriv2  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoN];
       define NDeriv3final [VDeriv2  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS VtoNfinal];

#define NDERIV [NDeriv1|NDeriv1final|NDeriv2|NDeriv2final|NDeriv3|NDeriv3final];
define NDERIV [NDeriv1|NDeriv2|NDeriv3];
define NDERIVFINAL [NDeriv1final|NDeriv2final|NDeriv3final];
define VDERIV [VDeriv|VDeriv1|VDeriv2];

       ###########################################
       #                                         #
       # verbs with incorporated nominal root    #
       #                                         #
       ###########################################
       define VRootInc [NRootQ VRootTrans];
       
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       # nominalized verb with incorporated nominal root:       #
       # "uywamichiy"                                           #
       #--------------------------------------------------------#
       define NRootInc [VRootInc  VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS [VtoN|VtoNfinal]];

       #--------------------#
       # nominal compounds  #
       #--------------------#
       
       define Compounds [[NRootQ|NDeriv1] DB MB NRootCMP NounSuffixes];


#define NounConverb  [[NDERIVFINAL] (HonAff) (N=N=3) (NtinWan)] ;
define NounConverb  [[NDERIVFINAL] (HonAff) (N=N=3) (N=N=5) (N=N=6) (N=N=7)] ;
define NounNormal  [[NROOT|NDERIV|NRootInc|Compounds] NounSuffixes] ;
define Noun [NounConverb|NounNormal];
define Verb  [[VROOT|VDERIV|VRootInc] VerbSuffixes];


#########################################################################
#########################################################################

       ############
       #          #
       # PRONOUNS #
       #          #
       ############

       #-------------------#
       # personal pronouns #
       #-------------------#
       define PrnPers @re"prnpers.regex";
       define PrnPersInfl [PrnPers  (HonAff) (N=N=1) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (N=N=5)^{0,2} (HonAff) (N=N=6)^{0,2} (N=N=7)^{0,2}];

       #------------------------#
       # demonstrative pronouns #
       #------------------------#
       define PrnDem @re"prndem.regex";
       define PrnDemInfl [PrnDem (HonAff) (AS=1) (HonAff) (AS=2) (N=N=1) (N=N=2) (N=N=3) (N=N=4) (N=N=5)^{0,2} (HonAff) (N=N=6)^{0,2} N=N=7^{0,2}];

       #------------------------#
       # interrogative pronouns #
       #------------------------#
       define PrnInterrog @re"prninterrog.regex";
       define PrnInterrogInfl [PrnInterrog (N=N=1) (N=N=3) (N=N=4) (N=N=5)^{0,2} (HonAff) (N=N=6)^{0,2} (N=N=7)^{0,2}];

define Prn [PrnPersInfl|PrnDemInfl|PrnInterrogInfl] .o. QuechuaOrtho;

#########################################################################

       #############
       #           #
       # PARTICLES #
       #           #
       #############
       
       #---------------------------#
       # normal (nominal) and      #
       # verbalizable particles    #
       #---------------------------#
       define Particle @re"particle.regex";
       define verbalizableParticle @re"particle-verb.regex";

       define ParticleBasic [verbalizableParticle (HonAff)(N=N=5)(HonAff)(N=N=6)^{0,2} (N=N=7)]; # zb. manantin

       #----------------------------#
       # verbalized particles       #
       # particle + NtoV = PartVerb #
       # hina-cha-                  #
       #----------------------------#
       define ParticleVerb [verbalizableParticle NtoV] VerbSuffixes;

       #--------------------------------------#
       # nominalized PartVerb                 #
       # Particle-NtoV + VtoN = PartVerbNoun #
       # ama-cha-y                            #
       #--------------------------------------#
       define ParticleVerbNoun [verbalizableParticle NtoV VerbalSuffixesBeforeNS [VtoN|VtoNfinal] (N=N=2) (N=N=3) (HonAff) (N=N=4) (N=N=5) (N=N=6)^{0,2} (N=N=7)];
     

define Particles VerbRulesLower .o. [[Particle|ParticleBasic|ParticleVerb|ParticleVerbNoun]] .o. VerbRulesUpper .o. QuechuaOrtho;

#########################################################################

       #-------------#
       # Punctuation #
       #-------------#
       
       define Punctuation @re"satzzeichen.regex";

##################################################################################

       ##############
       #  Letters   #
       ##############

       define Letters @re"letra.regex";


#########################################################################

       
       ###########
       #         #
       # NUMBERS #
       #         #
       ###########

       define Digits [1:1|2:2|3:3|4:4|5:5|6:6|7:7|8:8|9:9|%0:%0];
       define Nbr  Digits+ "[" "CARD" "]" ;

       #-----------------#
       # Ordinal numbers #
       #-----------------#
       define Ord @re"numord.regex";
       define WordNbr NRootNUM+;
       define OrdNbr [(Nbr|WordNbr) Ord];

    define Number [Nbr|OrdNbr|WordNbr];


################################################################################

       ####################
       #                  #
       # SPANISH WORDS    #
       #                  #
       ####################

       define Spanish  @re"lexikon-sp.regex" .o. SpanOrtho .o. UpperCase .o. LowerCase;


  define SpecialWord [Letters|Punctuation|Number|Spanish];
